Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.033

Regulating agricultural commodities—Laws applicable.

This chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the comprehensively regulated agricultural industry.

(1) Other laws applicable to agricultural commodities include the following chapters and the rules adopted thereunder:

Chapter 15.08 RCW Horticultural pests and diseases;

Chapter 15.13 RCW Horticultural plants, Christmas trees, and facilities—Inspection and licensing;

Chapter 15.14 RCW Planting stock;

Chapter 15.15 RCW Certified seed potatoes;

Chapter 15.17 RCW Standards of grades and packs;

Chapter 15.19 RCW Certification and inspection of ginseng;

Chapter 15.30 RCW Controlled atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables;

Chapter 15.49 RCW Seeds;

Chapter 15.53 RCW Commercial feed;

Chapter 15.54 RCW Fertilizers, minerals, and limes;

Chapter 15.58 RCW Washington pesticide control act;

Chapter 15.60 RCW Apiaries;

Chapter 15.64 RCW Farm marketing;

Chapter 15.83 RCW Agricultural marketing and fair practices;

Chapter 15.85 RCW Aquaculture marketing;

Chapter 15.86 RCW Organic products;

Chapter 15.92 RCW Center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources;

The food safety and security act under chapter 15.130 RCW;

Chapter 17.24 RCW Insect pests and plant diseases;

Chapter 19.94 RCW Weights and measures;

Chapter 20.01 RCW Agricultural products—Commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, agents;

Chapter 22.09 RCW Agricultural commodities;

Chapter 69.07 RCW Washington food processing act;

Chapter 69.25 RCW Washington wholesome eggs and egg products act;

Chapter 69.28 RCW Honey;

7 U.S.C., section 136, Federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act.

(2) In addition to the laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the agricultural industry as a whole, the dry pea and lentil industry is regulated by or must comply with the additional laws and rules adopted under 7 U.S.C., chapter 38, agricultural marketing act.

[ 2018 c 236 s 706; 2011 c 103 s 24; 2002 c 313 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.